Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 1.2 Seizure of Animals Being Cruelly Treated

4-1.2-1.
Seizure of animals being cruelly treated.

The RI state veterinarian, the general/special agent of the RI Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals (RISPCA), or any duly sworn and authorized state or municipal law enforcement officer may lawfully take charge and possession of any animal found abandoned or neglected or hazardously accumulated as defined in §

4-1-1

, or in the opinion of that veterinarian, agent, or officer is aged, maimed, disabled, lame, sick, diseased, injured, unfit for the labor it is performing, or cruelly treated, and may thereupon proceed to provide all necessary care and treatment required or take other appropriate action as determined by a licensed veterinarian.

Any person authorized to seize an animal pursuant to this section must leave written notice on the property where the animal was seized within twenty-four (24) hours of the seizure. This notice must be left in a location where it is reasonably likely to be found and must include the name, address, telephone number, and signature of the person seizing the animal; the reason for seizing the animal; and the location where the seized animal is being kept pending any order pursuant to §

4-1.2-3

. If the address of the animal owner is known, notification through certified mail with return receipt requested shall also be provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 242, § 1.

4-1.2-2.
Notice of hearing.

Any authorized person making a seizure may file with a district court that has jurisdiction over the matter a verified petition plainly stating those facts as to bring such animal within the jurisdiction of the court and praying for appropriate action by the court in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause a summons to be issued requiring the owner(s) or person(s) having responsibility for the care of the animal, if known, to appear in court at the time and place named, which summons shall be served not less than fourteen (14) days before the date of the hearing. If the owner(s) or person(s) having responsibility for the care of the animal is not known, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by publication in a newspaper having a circulation in the town in which the officer took charge of the animal not less than fourteen (14) days before the date of the hearing. The court shall further give notice to the petitioner of the time and place of the hearing not less than fourteen (14) days before the date of the hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 242, § 1.

4-1.2-3.
Order for temporary care of seized animals.

If it appears from the allegations of the petition and other affirmations of fact accompanying the petition, or provided subsequent thereto, that there is reasonable cause to find that the animal’s condition or the circumstances surrounding its care require that its custody be immediately assumed to safeguard its welfare, the court shall either:

Issue an order to the owner(s) or person(s) having responsibility for the care of the animal to show cause at such time as the court may designate why the court shall not vest in some suitable state, municipal, or other public or private agency or person the animal’s temporary care and custody pending a hearing on the petition; or

Issue an order vesting in some suitable state, municipal, or other public or private agency or person, the animal’s temporary care and custody, pending a hearing on the petition, which hearing shall be held within ten (10) days from the issuance of the order on the need for such temporary care and custody. The service of the orders may be made by any officer authorized by law to serve process, state police officer, indifferent person, or by certified mail with return receipt requested if the individual lives out of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 242, § 1.

4-1.2-4.
Posting of bond.

If the court issues an order pursuant to §

4-1.2-3

vesting the animal’s temporary care and custody in some suitable state, municipal, or other public or private agency or person, the owner(s) shall either surrender ownership of the animal or post a surety bond or cash bond with the agency or person in whom the animal’s temporary care and custody was vested. The surety bond or cash bond shall be in an amount sufficient to pay the reasonable expenses related to necessary veterinary care, shelter, feeding, and board that is reasonably anticipated to be incurred by the agency or person having temporary care and custody of the animal during the litigation of the process referenced in §

4-1.2-1

.

The surety bond or cash bond shall cover the expenses for a period as decided by the court with subsequent bonds being necessary upon the expiration of the preceding bond until the animal is transferred, returned, or otherwise treated pursuant to §

4-1.2-5

. Failure to post the original or subsequent bonds will result in forfeiture of the seized animals, with disposition as provided for pursuant to §

4-1.2-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 242, § 1.

4-1.2-5.
Disposition of seized animals.

If a seized animal is forfeited or surrendered pursuant to §

4-1.2-4

, or after hearing the court finds that the animal is neglected or cruelly treated, it may transfer ownership of the animal in any state, municipal, or other public or private agency that is permitted by law to care for neglected or cruelly treated animals or with any person found to be suitable or worthy of the responsibility by the court.

If, after hearing, the court finds that the animal is so injured or diseased, the court may order the animal into the care of a licensed veterinarian to provide the animal with appropriate treatment.

If, after hearing, the court finds that the animal is not neglected or cruelly treated, it may cause the animal to be returned to its owner(s) or person(s) having responsibility for its care or, if the owner(s) or person(s) is unknown or unwilling to resume caring for the animal, it may transfer ownership of the animal in any state, municipal, or other public or private agency or person found to be suitable or worthy of the responsibility.

If the court renders a final decision under subsection (a) or (b) of this section, the agency or person with whom the bond was posted shall return the balance, if any, of the bond to the owner(s). The amount of the bond to be returned to the owner(s) shall be calculated by dividing the amount of the bond by thirty (30) to establish the daily rate and subtracting the number of days less than thirty (30) that the agency or person has not had temporary care and custody of the animal.

If the court makes a finding pursuant to subsection (c) of this section after the issuance of an order of temporary care and custody pursuant to §

4-1.2-3

and the owner(s) of the animal has posted a bond pursuant to §

4-1.2-4(b)

, the agency or person with whom the bond was posted shall return all the bond(s) to the owner(s).

Unless the court finds that there was no probable cause to institute a complaint that the animal is not neglected or cruelly treated, the expense incurred by the state or a municipality in providing proper food, shelter, and care to an animal it has seized pursuant to this chapter and the expense incurred by any state, municipal, or other public or private agency or person in providing temporary care and custody to an animal pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be determined by calculating the average costs from three (3) providers of the necessary equivalent services related to the veterinary care, sheltering, feeding, and board in the state, which was provided to the animal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 242, § 1.